Hawaii statutes.
§652-5 Successive sequestration of wages,
upon change of employment. Whenever any judgment debtor has left the
employ of any garnishee, against whom an order has been duly issued, before the
full amount of the judgment has been paid, and has entered the employment of
some other person, or of the State, or any political subdivision thereof, then
the judgment creditor may sequester any wages due the judgment debtor from the
new employer by filing with such person, or the respective government
comptroller or other officer a certified copy of the judgment and an affidavit
of the judgment creditor, showing the amount remaining due and unpaid on
account of the judgment.

Thereafter, the new garnishee shall proceed to
pay the same percentages of wages as required in an original garnishment, on
the balance of the judgment, from week to week or month to month, until the
balance due, with legal interest, is fully paid; or until such employment of
the judgment debtor ceases. [L 1915, c 64, §1; am L 1919, c 161, §1; am imp L
1921, c 66, §1 and am c 202, §1; RL 1925, §2830; am L 1927, c 96, §5; am L
1933, c 172, §1; RL 1935, §4274; RL 1945, §10305; RL 1955, §237-5; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §12; HRS §652-5]

Case Notes

A garnishment under this section has equal legal standing
with an original garnishee summons; priority being determined according to time
of receipt by garnishee. 50 H. 223, 437 P.2d 95 (1968).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next